Wyoming, session 2025, HB0074.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-3-403 is created to read:

18-3-403. County clerks; rejection or notation of
frivolous filings.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0074

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0242
(i) "Filing" means any document filed or
recorded with the county clerk except for conveyances as
defined by W.S. 34-1-102 and liens;

(ii) "Frivolous" means lacking an arguable basis
in law or in fact or being presented for any improper
purpose, including harassment.

(b) A county clerk may reject any frivolous filing
that a person seeks to file with the clerk, in accordance
with the following:

(i) If the clerk determines that the filing may
be frivolous, the clerk may decline to file the filing and
may hold the filing in abeyance, subject to this
subsection;

(ii) For any filing that the clerk declines to
file or holds in abeyance, the clerk shall file a motion
with the district court in the county for an order that the
filing is frivolous. The person seeking to file the filing
shall be given notice and an opportunity to be heard before
the district court acts on the motion;
HB0074

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0242

(iii) If the district court determines that the
filing is frivolous, the court may enter an order declaring
the filing frivolous, after which the clerk may reject the
filing. For any filing rejected under this subsection, the
clerk shall refund any fee collected from the person
seeking to file the filing within ten (10) days of the
district court's order;

(iv) No filing shall be rejected under this
subsection if the clerk has deposited any fee received for
the filing or if the clerk has filed the filing.

(c) A county clerk may seek to notate any filing
previously filed with the clerk in accordance with the
following:

(i) The clerk may review any filed filings to
determine if a filing is frivolous;

(ii) Upon identifying a filing that the clerk
believes may be frivolous, the clerk may file a motion with
the district court in the county for an order that the
HB0074

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0242
filing is frivolous. The person who submitted the filing to
the clerk shall be given notice and an opportunity to be
heard before the district court acts on the motion;

(iii) If the district court determines that the
filing is frivolous, the court may enter an order declaring
the filing frivolous;

(iv) Upon the entry of an order under paragraph
(iii) of this subsection, the clerk may include a notation
with the filing stating that the filing has been deemed
frivolous.

(d) Any filing declared frivolous by a district court
under this section shall have no legal effect.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0074